Florida, session 2026, SB7012.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSubsection (5) of section 319.1414, Florida 21 Statutes, is amended to read: 22 319.1414âDepartment-authorized private rebuilt inspection 23 providers; investigations; examinations; proceedings; subpoenas 24 and other process; witnesses; oaths; rules.â 25 (5)âInformation received by the department as a result of 26 an investigation or examination conducted pursuant to this 27 section is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 28 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation 29 or examination ceases to be active or administrative action 30 taken by the department has concluded or been made part of a 31 hearing or court proceeding. The department may release 32 information that is made confidential and exempt under this 33 subsection in furtherance of its official duties and 34 responsibilities or, if released to another governmental agency, 35 in the furtherance of that agencyâs official duties and 36 responsibilities. This subsection is subject to the Open 37 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 38 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and 39 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 40 Section 2.âSubsection (7) of section 319.25, Florida 41 Statutes, is amended to read: 42 319.25âCancellation of certificates; investigations; 43 examinations; proceedings; subpoenas and other process; 44 witnesses; oaths; rules.â 45 (7)âInformation received by the department as a result of 46 an investigation or examination conducted pursuant to this 47 section is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 48 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation 49 or examination ceases to be active or administrative action 50 taken by the department has concluded or been made part of a 51 hearing or court proceeding. The department may release 52 information that is made confidential and exempt under this 53 subsection in furtherance of its official duties and 54 responsibilities or, if released to another governmental agency, 55 in the furtherance of that agencyâs official duties and 56 responsibilities. This subsection is subject to the Open 57 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 58 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and 59 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 60 Section 3.âSubsection (5) of section 320.861, Florida 61 Statutes, is amended to read: 62 320.861âInvestigations; subpoenas and other process; oaths; 63 rules.â 64 (5)âInformation received by the department as a result of 65 an investigation or examination conducted pursuant to this 66 section is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 67 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation 68 or examination ceases to be active or administrative action 69 taken by the department has concluded or been made part of a 70 hearing or court proceeding. The department may release 71 information that is made confidential and exempt under this 72 subsection in furtherance of its official duties and 73 responsibilities or, if released to another governmental agency, 74 in the furtherance of that agencyâs official duties and 75 responsibilities. This subsection is subject to the Open 76 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 77 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and 78 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 79 Section 4.âSubsection (5) of section 322.71, Florida 80 Statutes, is amended to read: 81 322.71âInvestigations; examinations; proceedings; subpoenas 82 and other process; witnesses; oaths; rules.â 83 (5)âInformation received by the department as a result of 84 an investigation or examination conducted pursuant to this 85 section is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 86 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution until the investigation 87 or examination ceases to be active or administrative action 88 taken by the department has concluded or been made part of a 89 hearing or court proceeding. The department may release 90 information that is made confidential and exempt under this 91 subsection in furtherance of its official duties and 92 responsibilities or, if released to another governmental agency, 93 in the furtherance of that agencyâs official duties and 94 responsibilities. This subsection is subject to the Open 95 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 96 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and 97 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 98 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.